Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-556
Abstracters; liability.

A registered abstracter shall show each link in the chain of title, and failure to do so shall render him or her liable to any person injured by such omission. In adding extensions to an old abstract, a registered abstracter shall not be deemed to certify to or verify accuracy of entries prior to the first date given in the certificate of extension. When a registered abstracter relies upon the numerical index alone to refer him or her to all entries upon the records affecting the title to property, such reliance shall be at his or her peril. A registered abstracter shall be liable for omission of notice of encumbrance in an abstract.

Laws 1969, c. 615, § 13, p. 2501;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-529;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 26.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).